West Virginia, session 2026, SB362.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Pharmacy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-5-7 of this code, modified by the Board of Pharmacy to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 22, 2025, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (immunizations administered by pharmacists, pharmacy interns, and pharmacy technicians, 15 CSR 12), is authorized.